apertium-sv-da/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="abdom/en__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inas</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inas</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ly__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vot/um__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ums</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umets</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ums</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umen</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umens</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kof/ot__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ots</l>       <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oten</l>      <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otens</l>     <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otar</l>      <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ötter</l>     <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otars</l>     <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ötters</l>    <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otarna</l>    <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ötterna</l>   <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otarnas</l>   <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ötternas</l>  <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="å__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ets</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ts</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ets</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ts</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ns</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ns</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-nas</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:nas</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fe__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ernas</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="go__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="skriptum">        <i>skript</i><par n="vot/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kofot">           <i>kof</i><par n="kof/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="unikum">          <i>unik</i><par n="vot/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="stenfot">         <i>stenf</i><par n="kof/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="abdomen">         <i>abdom</i><par n="abdom/en__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="getfot">          <i>getf</i><par n="kof/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="å">               <i>å</i><par n="å__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ä">               <i>ä</i><par n="å__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="abc">             <i>abc</i><par n="å__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="misstroendevotum"><i>misstroendevot</i><par n="vot/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="votum">           <i>vot</i><par n="vot/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="biografi">        <i>biografi</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="busschaufför">    <i>busschaufför</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sjukhusdirektör"> <i>sjukhusdirektör</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="major">           <i>major</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="grafteori">       <i>grafteori</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lungemboli">      <i>lungemboli</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pandemi">         <i>pandemi</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="konstindustri">   <i>konstindustri</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dystopi">         <i>dystopi</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="takykardi">       <i>takykardi</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kategori">        <i>kategori</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="glossolali">      <i>glossolali</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="chefredaktör">    <i>chefredaktör</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="autotypi">        <i>autotypi</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kaldé">           <i>kaldé</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="filisté">         <i>filisté</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="collier">         <i>collier</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="maskopi">         <i>maskopi</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="psykoterapi">     <i>psykoterapi</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="salat">           <i>salat</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ost">             <i>ost</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pryderi">         <i>pryderi</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="mångsyssleri">    <i>mångsyssleri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="traktan">         <i>traktan</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kräm">            <i>kräm</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="penninglotteri">  <i>penninglotteri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="saint">           <i>saint</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dagdriveri">      <i>dagdriveri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tetraetylbly">    <i>tetraetylbly</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="samhällsmaskineri"><i>samhällsmaskineri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ramadan">         <i>ramadan</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="påbrå">           <i>påbrå</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="charpi">          <i>charpi</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="demi-sec">        <i>demi-sec</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lärkträ">         <i>lärkträ</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ringside">        <i>ringside</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="växelrytteri">    <i>växelrytteri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tafatt">          <i>tafatt</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="barbari">         <i>barbari</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="skådespeleri">    <i>skådespeleri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="beige">           <i>beige</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ändträ">          <i>ändträ</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="vetekli">         <i>vetekli</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kvarto">          <i>kvarto</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="fältartilleri">   <i>fältartilleri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="slaveri">         <i>slaveri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="go">              <i>go</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kindergarten">    <i>kindergarten</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ly">              <i>ly</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="skäkt">           <i>skäkt</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="senior">          <i>senior</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ädelträ">         <i>ädelträ</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ostan">           <i>ostan</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="eloquentia">      <i>eloquentia</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="naketmåleri">     <i>naketmåleri</i><par n="ly__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sternum">         <i>sternum</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
